Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
PART 5 Regional Housing Authorities

8-3-100.
Procedure for creating an authority.

If the governing body of each of two or more contiguous counties by resolution declares that there is a need for one housing authority to be created for all of such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, a public body corporate and politic to be known as a regional housing authority shall thereupon exist for all of such counties and shall exercise its powers and other functions in such counties. Thereupon, each county housing authority created for each of such counties shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as provided in this part. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section to the contrary, the governing body of a county shall not adopt a resolution as aforesaid if there is a county housing authority created for such county which has any bonds or notes outstanding unless, first, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority on all such bonds and notes, and, second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as provided in this part. When the above two conditions are complied with and such regional housing authority is created and authorized to exercise its powers and other functions, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority; and all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligations of such regional housing authority; and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1.

8-3-101.
Transfer of property to an authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided in Code Section 8-3-100, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority, which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided in Code Section 8-3-100.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6.

8-3-102.
Conditions precedent to adoption of resolution declaring need for an authority.

The governing body of each of two or more contiguous counties may by resolution declare that there is a need for one regional housing authority to be created for all such counties to exercise in such counties powers and other functions prescribed for a regional housing authority, only if such governing body finds:

That insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

That a regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit than the housing authority of such county.

In determining whether dwelling accommodations are unsafe or insanitary, the governing body of a county shall take into consideration the safety and sanitation of dwellings, the light and air space available to the inhabitants of such dwellings, the degree of overcrowding, the size and arrangement of the rooms, and the extent to which conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes exist in such dwellings.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6.

8-3-103.
Public hearings on adoption of resolution.

The governing body of a county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by Code Sections 8-3-100, 8-3-102, and 8-3-104 unless a public hearing has first been held. The clerk of such county shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing at least ten days prior to the day on which the hearing is to be held. Such notice shall be given by publication in a newspaper published in such county or, if there is no newspaper published in such county, in a newspaper published in the state and having a general circulation in such county. Upon the date fixed for such public hearing, an opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents of such county and to all other interested persons.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6.

8-3-104.
Resolution as conclusive evidence of an authority’s establishment; sufficiency of resolution.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the regional housing authority, the regional housing authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become created as a public body corporate and politic and to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers under this part upon proof of the adoption of a resolution by the governing body of each of the counties creating the regional housing authority declaring the need for the regional housing authority. Each such resolution shall be deemed sufficient if it declares that there is need for the regional housing authority and finds in substantially such terms as appear in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 8-3-102, no further detail being necessary, that the conditions enumerated in those paragraphs exist.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 8/HB 24.

Cross references.

Hearsay rule exceptions, §

24-8-803

.

Self-authentication, §

24-9-902

.

Public records, §

24-10-1005

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment made by that Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

8-3-105.
Powers of an authority generally.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, a regional housing authority and the commissioners thereof shall, within the area of operation of such regional housing authority, have the same functions, rights, powers, duties, privileges, immunities, and limitations provided for housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such housing authorities. All the provisions of law applicable to housing authorities created for cities or counties and the commissioners of such authorities shall be applicable to regional housing authorities and the commissioners thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 2.

8-3-106.
Commissioners — Appointment by county governing bodies.

The governing bodies of the counties desiring to form a regional housing authority shall have the right to establish by resolution the composition and size of the board of commissioners of the regional housing authority; provided, however, that each county shall have at least one commissioner on the board of commissioners of the regional housing authority and that at least one of the commissioners shall be a recipient of direct assistance from a public housing authority located within such region. The governing body of each county shall appoint the successors of the commissioner or commissioners appointed by it. A certificate of the appointment of any commissioner appointed pursuant to this Code section shall be filed with the clerk of the county, and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 573, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 737, § 2.

8-3-107.
Commissioners — Appointment of additional commissioner.

If the area of operation of a regional housing authority consists of an even number of counties, the commissioners of the regional housing authority appointed by the governing bodies of such counties shall appoint one additional commissioner whose term of office shall be as provided in Code Section 8-3-108 for a commissioner of a regional housing authority. The commissioners of such authority appointed by the governing bodies of such counties shall likewise appoint each person to succeed such additional commissioner, provided that the term of office of such person begins during the terms of office of the commissioners appointing him. A certificate of the appointment of any such additional commissioner of such regional housing authority shall be filed with the other records of the regional housing authority and shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such additional commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1.

8-3-108.
Commissioners — Terms of office; removal; record of removal proceedings.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall be appointed for terms of five years, except that all vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. Each commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed and has qualified.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed by the officer or officers, or their successors, appointing such commissioner; but he shall be removed only after he has been given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing thereon and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

In the event of the removal of any commissioner, a record of the proceedings, together with the charges and findings thereon, shall be filed as required for the certificate of appointment of such commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1.

8-3-109.
Commissioners — Vesting of powers of an authority in commissioners; selection of chairman and other officers; employees; quorum; location of meetings.

The commissioners shall constitute the regional housing authority, and the powers of such authority shall be vested in such commissioners in office from time to time.

The commissioners of a regional housing authority shall elect a chairman from among the commissioners and shall have power to select or employ such other officers and employees as the regional housing authority may require.

A majority of the commissioners of a regional housing authority shall constitute a quorum of such authority for the purpose of conducting its business and exercising its powers and for all other purposes.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to prevent meetings of the commissioners of a housing authority anywhere within the perimeter boundaries of the area of operation of the authority or within any additional area where the housing authority is authorized to undertake a housing project.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6; Ga. L. 1951, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 734, § 1.

8-3-110.
Area of operation of county and regional authorities.

The area of operation of a housing authority created for a county shall include all of the county for which it is created; and the area of operation of a regional housing authority shall include all of the counties for which such regional housing authority is created and established, provided that a county or regional housing authority shall not undertake any housing project or projects within the boundaries of any city unless a resolution shall have been adopted by the governing body of such city, and also by any housing authority which shall have been theretofore established and authorized to exercise its powers in such city, declaring that there is a need for the county or regional housing authority to exercise its powers within such city.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6.

Editor’s notes.

The language of this Code section was enacted by a 1943 amendment to Ga. L. 1937, p. 210, and was designated by Section 4B of the 1937 Act. The 1937 Act was amended further by Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1, which repealed Section 4B and enacted a new Section 4B. However, the new Section 4B contained language which wholly repeated the language of the original Section 4B. Since the 1952 Act thus did not have the practical effect of repealing the language of the original Section 4B, the 1943 amendment (Ga. L. 1943, p. 146, § 6) is being treated as the sole basis for this Code section. The remainder of the language of the Section 4B enacted by the 1952 Act is codified at Code Sections 8-3-111 through 8-3-118.

8-3-111.
Addition of counties to an authority — Procedure; effect.

The area of operation of a regional housing authority shall be increased from time to time to include one or more additional contiguous counties not already within the area of operation of a regional housing authority if the governing body of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of such regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority, and the governing body of each such additional county or counties each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for the inclusion of such additional county or counties in the area of operation of such regional housing authority. Upon the adoption of such resolution, the county housing authority created for each such additional county shall cease to exist except for the purpose of winding up its affairs and executing a deed to the regional housing authority as provided in Code Section 8-3-112.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, such resolutions shall not be adopted if there is a county housing authority created for any such additional county which has any bonds or notes outstanding unless, first, all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to the substitution of such regional housing authority in lieu of such county housing authority as the obligor thereon and, second, the commissioners of such county housing authority adopt a resolution consenting to the transfer of all the rights, contracts, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority to such regional housing authority as hereinafter provided.

When the above two conditions are complied with and the area of operation of such regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county, as provided in this Code section, all rights, contracts, agreements, obligations, and property, real and personal, of such county housing authority shall be in the name of and vest in such regional housing authority, all obligations of such county housing authority shall be the obligation of such regional housing authority, and all rights and remedies of any person against such county housing authority may be asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such regional housing authority to the same extent as they might have been asserted, enforced, and prosecuted against such county housing authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-112.
Addition of counties to an authority — Transfer of property to authority.

When any real property of a county housing authority vests in a regional housing authority as provided in Code Section 8-3-111, the county housing authority shall execute a deed of such property to the regional housing authority which thereupon shall file such deed in the office provided for the filing of deeds, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall affect the vesting of property in the regional housing authority as provided in Code Section 8-3-111.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-113.
Addition of counties to an authority — Conditions precedent to adoption of resolution declaring need for expansion of authority.

The governing body of each of the counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority, and the governing body of each such additional county or counties may by resolution declare that there is a need for the inclusion of such county or counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, only if:

The governing body of each such additional county or counties finds that insanitary or unsafe inhabited dwelling accommodations exist in such county or there is a shortage of safe or sanitary dwelling accommodations in such county available to persons of low income at rentals they can afford; and

The governing body of each of the counties then included in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, the commissioners of the regional housing authority, and the governing body of each such additional county or counties find that the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if the area of operation of the regional housing authority is increased to include such additional county or counties.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-114.
Exclusion of counties from regional authority — Procedure generally; effect of reducing area of operation to one county.

The area of operation of a regional housing authority which has undertaken the development of one or more housing projects may be decreased from time to time to exclude one or more counties from such area if the governing body of each of the counties in such area and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding such county or counties from such area, provided that this action may not be taken if the regional housing authority has outstanding any bonds or notes, unless all holders of such bonds and notes consent in writing to such action.

If any action taken pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section decreases the area of operation of the regional housing authority to only one county, such authority shall thereupon constitute and become a housing authority for such county in the same manner and with the same rights, powers, and immunities as though such authority were created by and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers pursuant to Code Sections 8-3-4 through 8-3-6; and the commissioners of such authority shall be thereupon appointed as provided in Code Section 8-3-50 for the appointment of commissioners of a housing authority created for a county.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-115.
Exclusion of county from regional authority — Conditions precedent to adoption of resolution declaring need for exclusion.

The governing body of each of the counties in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority may adopt a resolution declaring that there is a need for excluding a county or counties from such area only if:

Each such governing body of the counties to remain in the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the commissioners of the regional housing authority find that, because of facts arising or determined subsequent to the time when such area first included the county or counties to be excluded, the regional housing authority would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit if such county or counties were excluded from such area; and

The governing body of each such county or counties to be excluded and the commissioners of the regional housing authority each also find that, because of the aforesaid changed facts, another housing authority for such county or counties would be a more efficient or economical administrative unit to function in such county or counties.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-116.
Detachment of a county by its own resolution; assumption of regional authority’s bonds, notes, and other obligations by an authority thereafter established for county.

Notwithstanding Code Sections 8-3-114 and 8-3-115, the governing body of any county may by resolution detach the county from the area of operation of its regional housing authority if such housing authority has undertaken no housing projects and, upon the adoption of such resolution, the county shall cease to be included in the area of operation of the regional housing authority, provided that this action may not be taken if the regional housing authority has outstanding any bonds, notes, or other obligations, unless all the holders of such bonds, notes, or other obligations consent in writing to such action.

The housing authority thereafter established for any county detached from the area of operation of a regional housing authority may assume and pay all or any portion of the outstanding bonds, notes, or other obligations of such regional housing authority, provided that the exclusion of any county from the area of operation of the regional housing authority and the failure of the housing authority of such county to assume all or any part of such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall not in any way affect the said bonds, notes, or other obligations nor the rights or remedies of the obligees of such regional housing authority with respect thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-117.
Creation of an authority for a county after exclusion or detachment from a regional authority; appointment of commissioners; scope of powers; subsequent inclusion in a regional authority.

At any time after the exclusion or detachment of any county from the area of operation of a regional housing authority, as provided in Code Sections 8-3-114 through 8-3-116, the governing body of any such county may adopt a resolution declaring that there is need for a housing authority in the county if the governing body shall find such need according to the provisions of Code Sections 8-3-4 through 8-3-6. Thereafter a public body corporate and politic to be known as the housing authority of the county shall exist for such county, and five commissioners shall be appointed for such authority by the governing body of such county. The authority may transact business and exercise its powers in the same manner and shall have the same rights, powers, and immunities as though created by said Code Sections 8-3-4 through 8-3-6.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed as preventing such county from thereafter being included within the area of operation of a regional housing authority as provided in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.

8-3-118.
Public hearing prior to adoption of resolution.

The governing body of a county shall not adopt any resolution authorized by Code Sections 8-3-110 through 8-3-117 unless a public hearing has first been held in the manner prescribed in Code Section 8-3-103.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 365, § 1.